Kentucky statutes. TITLE XX Alcoholic Beverages
Prohibition

242.190.
Effective date of establishment of dry territory — Effect of annexation.

When a majority of the votes cast at a local option election are in favor of establishing dry territory, the territory shall be dry at the expiration of sixty (60) days from the date of the entry of the certificate of the county board of election commissioners in the order book of the county judge/executive.

Upon the annexation of any local option territory by a city, either before July 15, 1980, or subsequent thereto, the annexed territory shall assume the same local option status as the local option status of the annexing city. Nothing in this section shall impair the right of any precinct in the annexed territory to determine its own status with respect to the legal sales of alcoholic beverages in accordance with the provisions of KRS Chapter 242.

History.

2554c-15: amend. Acts 1978, ch. 384, § 380, effective June 17, 1978; 1980, ch. 92, § 1, effective July 15, 1980; 2013, ch. 121, § 20, effective June 25, 2013.

242.195.
Vote for prohibition in precinct of a city with population of 12,000 or more to be applied precinct-wide — Exemptions.

Notwithstanding KRS

242.125

, when the voters of any precinct located either partially or entirely within a qualifying city make KRS

242.220

to

242.430

apply to the precinct, the provisions of KRS

242.220

to

242.430

shall apply throughout the entire territory of the precinct, except in any area exempted under subsection (2) of this section. For purposes of this section, a “qualifying city” means a city that contains a total population of twelve thousand (12,000) or greater within its municipal boundaries, based on the most recent decennial census.

The provisions of KRS

242.220

to

242.430

shall not apply to any of the following that existed in a precinct prior to the submission of a petition under KRS

242.020

for that precinct:

An entertainment destination center project meeting the qualifications of KRS 148.853(2)(b);

A theme restaurant destination attraction project meeting the qualifications of KRS 148.853(2)(c); or

Within the established boundaries of a district of special interest created by the city pursuant to the provisions of KRS 100.203(1)(e) that:

Is designated as an entertainment district; and

Has a minimum direct investment by the city government in infrastructure or other public space of at least five million dollars ($5,000,000).

The boundaries of a district of special interest meeting the qualifications of subsection (2)(c) of this section shall not be enlarged or modified to include any additional territory at any time after the submission of a petition under KRS

242.020

unless the voters of the precinct do not make KRS

242.220

to

242.430

apply to the precinct.

History.

Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 8, § 1, effective June 25, 2013.

242.200.
Discontinuance of dry status in a territory — Effective date.

When a majority of the votes cast at an election are in favor of establishing wet or moist territory, the territory shall be wet or moist at the expiration of sixty (60) days from the date of the entry of the certificate of the county board of election commissioners in the order book of the county judge/executive.

History.

2554c-16: amend. Acts 1978, ch. 384, § 381, effective June 17, 1978; 2013, ch. 121, § 21, effective June 25, 2013.

242.210.
Effect of county adopting or rejecting prohibition. [Repealed.]

242.220.
Invalidity of certain licenses previously issued in wet territory that has become dry or moist — Recovery of money paid for unexpired period of license — Issuance of retail alcoholic beverage license in any dry territory prohibited.

After a territory becomes dry or moist, any previously issued license that is no longer available in that territory shall become invalid, but the licensee shall be entitled to recover from the county or city to which the license money was paid, a part of the license money proportionate to the unexpired period of the license.

No retail alcoholic beverage license shall be issued in any dry territory.

History.

2554c-15: amend. 2013, ch. 121, § 22, effective June 25, 2013.

242.230.
Traffic in alcoholic beverages in dry territory prohibited — Unauthorized traffic in alcoholic beverages in moist territory prohibited — Unlawful possession prohibited — Exception for private residence or event.

No person in dry territory shall sell, barter, loan, procure for, or provide another, or keep or transport for sale, barter, or loan, directly or indirectly, any alcoholic beverage.

No person in moist territory shall sell, barter, loan, procure for, or provide another, or keep or transport for sale, barter, or loan, directly or indirectly, any alcoholic beverage unless the sale of that alcoholic beverage has been specifically authorized in that moist territory under a limited local option election.

No person shall possess any alcoholic beverage unless it has been lawfully acquired and is intended to be used lawfully, and in any action the defendant shall have the burden of proving that the alcoholic beverages found in his or her possession were lawfully acquired and were intended for lawful use.

It shall not be a violation of this section for a person to possess or consume, or to provide alcoholic beverages to others in dry or moist territory, if:

The alcoholic beverages were lawfully purchased in wet or moist territory;

The alcoholic beverages are not sold to any person in dry or moist territory;

Any person possessing or consuming alcohol is twenty-one (21) years of age or older;

The possession, consumption, or provision occurs at a private residence or private event, regardless of whether the venue is a public place; and

The possession, consumption, or provision does not occur at a public place in violation of KRS Chapter 222.

For purposes of this section, an event is public, not private, if any member of the public is permitted to enter or attend the event upon payment of consideration.

History.

2554c-18, 2554c-37: amend. 2013, ch. 121, § 23, effective June 25, 2013; 2019 ch. 201, § 1, effective April 9, 2019.

242.240.
Sale or gift of articles not classed as alcoholic beverages restricted.

A person shall not sell or give any of the articles listed in KRS 241.010(2)(a) to (e) and (h) as not within the definition of alcoholic beverages, knowing that, or under such circumstances that, the seller or giver might reasonably deduce that the purchaser or person to whom the article is given intends to use it for beverage purposes.

History.

2554c-40: amend. Acts 1998, ch. 121, § 7, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 435, § 6, effective July 14, 2000; 2008, ch. 28, § 4, effective July 15, 2008.

242.250.
Distributing, soliciting or receiving contracts or orders in dry territory prohibited, when — Same prohibition on contracts or orders to any moist territory unless sale of alcoholic beverages specifically authorized under limited local option election — Immunity for licensed common carriers — Absolute defense.

No person, while representing either the buyer or seller, shall distribute, solicit, or receive contracts, proposals, or orders for the purchase or sale of any alcoholic beverages, or distribute any handbills or posters advertising them in dry territory.

Each act of distributing, soliciting, or receiving contracts, proposals, or orders as denounced in subsection (1), and each day in which advertising matter is distributed, shall constitute a separate offense.

This chapter shall not prevent any manufacturer of or wholesale dealer in alcoholic beverages, or any authorized agent of either from making contracts of barrel, case, or package lots in any dry or moist territory, if his or her distilleries, breweries, wineries, or warehouses are located in that territory and his or her products are to be shipped into territory, either within or without the state, where alcoholic beverages may lawfully be sold.

Subsections (1) and (2) of this section shall also apply to moist territory unless the sale of the alcoholic beverage in question has been specifically authorized in that moist territory under a limited local option election.

No properly licensed common carrier or any of its employees acting on behalf of a consignor shall be liable for a violation of this section.

Proof that the purchaser represented in writing that the delivery address is located in wet territory shall be an absolute defense to a violation of this section on behalf of a retailer, winery, small farm winery, or distillery in connection with the delivery or shipment of alcoholic beverages purchased at retail.

History.

2554c-19: amend. 2013, ch. 121, § 24, effective June 25, 2013; 2018 ch. 164, § 9, effective April 13, 2018.

242.260.
Transportation and delivery in dry or moist territory prohibited — Exception for any moist territory where sale of alcoholic beverages specifically authorized under limited local option election — Immunity for common carriers — Absolute defense — Exception for private residence or event.

It shall be unlawful for any person to bring into, transfer to another, deliver, or distribute in any dry or moist territory, except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, any alcoholic beverage, regardless of its name. Each package of such beverage so brought, transferred, or delivered in such territory shall constitute a separate offense. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent any distiller or manufacturer or any authorized agent of a distiller, manufacturer, or wholesale dealer from transporting or causing to be transported by a licensed carrier any alcoholic beverage to their distilleries, breweries, wineries, or warehouses where the sale of such beverage may be lawful, either in or out of the state.

Subsection (1) of this section shall also apply to any moist territory unless the sale of the alcoholic beverage in question has been specifically authorized in that moist territory under a limited local option election.

No properly licensed common carrier or any of its employees acting on behalf of a consignor shall be liable for a violation of this section.

Proof that the purchaser represented in writing that the delivery address is located in wet territory shall be an absolute defense to a violation of this section on behalf of a retailer, winery, small farm winery, or distillery in connection with the delivery or shipment of alcoholic beverages purchased at retail.

It shall not be a violation of this section for a person to bring alcoholic beverages that were lawfully purchased in wet or moist territory into dry or moist territory to a private residence, or to a private event regardless of whether the venue is a public place, for personal consumption or consumption by others so long as the possession, consumption, or provision does not occur at a public place in violation of KRS Chapter 222. For purposes of this subsection, an event is public, not private, if any member of the public is permitted to enter or attend the event upon payment of consideration.

History.

2554c-20: amend. Acts 1942, ch. 186, §§ 1, 3; 2013, ch. 121, § 25, effective June 25, 2013; 2018 ch. 164, § 10, effective April 13, 2018; 2019 ch. 201, § 2, effective April 9, 2019.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

“Alcoholic beverage” has been substituted for “intoxicating liquor” in order to fit the definitions contained in KRS

242.010

.

242.270.
C.O.D. shipments of alcoholic beverages in dry territory prohibited — Same prohibition on C.O.D. shipments to any moist territory unless sale of alcoholic beverages specifically authorized under limited local option election — Immunity for common carriers — Absolute defense.

No person shall sell or deliver any alcoholic beverages that are to be paid for on delivery, in dry territory.

Such transactions shall be deemed sales at the place where the money is paid or the goods delivered.

This section shall also apply to the sale or delivery of any alcoholic beverages that are to be paid for on delivery in moist territory unless the sale of the alcoholic beverage in question has been specifically authorized in that moist territory under a limited local option election.

No properly licensed common carrier or any of its employees acting on behalf of a consignor shall be liable for a violation of this section.

Proof that the purchaser represented in writing that the delivery address is located in wet territory shall be an absolute defense to a violation of this section on behalf of a retailer, winery, small farm winery, or distillery in connection with the delivery or shipment of alcoholic beverages purchased at retail.

History.

2554c-23: amend. 2013, ch. 121, § 26, effective June 25, 2013; 2018 ch. 164, § 11, effective April 13, 2018.

242.280.
Receiving alcoholic beverages from carrier in dry territory prohibited — Exception for receiving or accepting alcoholic beverages to be sold in lawful territory within or without state — Same prohibition on receiving alcoholic beverages in any moist territory unless sale of alcoholic beverages specifically authorized under limited local option election.

It shall be unlawful for any person of dry territory to receive or accept any alcoholic beverage from a common carrier or from any person who has transported the beverage in or into such territory for compensation, hire, or profit of any kind whatsoever either directly or indirectly. Each and every package of said alcoholic beverage so received or accepted shall constitute a separate offense. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent any distiller or manufacturer of alcoholic beverages or any authorized agent of a distiller or manufacturer or wholesale dealer from receiving or accepting any alcoholic beverages which are to be sold in a territory where the sale of such beverages may be lawful either in or out of the state.

Subsection (1) of this section shall apply to any moist territory unless the sale of the alcoholic beverage in question has been specifically authorized in that moist territory under a limited local option election.

History.

2554c-21: amend. Acts 1942, ch. 186, §§ 2, 3; 2013, ch. 121, § 27, effective June 25, 2013; 2013, ch. 121, § 27, effective June 25, 2013.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

“Alcoholic beverage” has been substituted for “intoxicating liquor” in order to fit the definitions contained in KRS

242.010

.

242.290.
Shipments across county and out of dry or moist territory not affected.

KRS

242.260

and

242.280

shall not apply to the transportation of alcoholic beverages through dry or moist territory to a point in some other state, or to a point in this state where alcoholic beverages may be lawfully sold; or to the receipt or acceptance by a common carrier from a manufacturer for transportation to a point in another state or to a point in this state where alcoholic beverages may lawfully be sold.

History.

2554c-22: amend. 2013, ch. 121, § 28, effective June 25, 2013.

242.300.
Manufacture of small quantities not prohibited in dry territory.

The normal restrictions applicable in dry territory shall not apply to any manufacturer who in good faith and in the usual course of trade sells alcoholic beverages of the manufacturer’s own make, at his or her manufactory, in quantities of not less than three (3) gallons delivered at one time for immediate transportation, to a point in some other state, or to a point in this state where alcoholic beverages may be lawfully sold.

History.

2554c-41: amend. 2013, ch. 121, § 29, effective June 25, 2013.

242.310.
Renting of property, or hiring vehicle for transportation is nuisance — Forfeiture.

Any person knowingly or intentionally renting or permitting the use of, or using, any premises, or part thereof, or any vehicle for the purpose of unlawfully selling or transporting or possessing intoxicating liquors in dry territory, shall be guilty of a nuisance and of a violation of this chapter.

Any property so used shall be forfeited to the state. The forfeiture shall extend to the whole of the premises or vehicle owned by the defendant, or to his interest in said property, including all land and buildings in one boundary.

History.

2554c-24.

242.320.
Action for forfeiture.

Any Commonwealth’s attorney, county attorney, mayor of a city, or any private citizen may maintain an action in equity in the name of the state upon relation of said officers or citizen against the owner to forfeit property declared a nuisance by KRS

242.310

.

If the petition is filed by a private citizen, it shall not be dismissed except upon a sworn statement made by the citizen and his attorney, setting forth the reasons why same should be dismissed, and except upon approval in writing in open court by the Commonwealth’s attorney or the county attorney.

History.

2554c-24: amend. Acts 1990, ch. 88, § 83, effective July 1, 1992.

242.330.
Sale of forfeited property and disposition of proceeds.

Upon a judgment of forfeiture under KRS

242.320

, the court shall direct the sheriff to sell the property. The sale shall be made in the same manner as sales under execution, and the same fees shall be allowed the officers conducting the sale.

The sheriff shall pay first out of the purchase money any valid recorded liens on the property so sold. The court may in its discretion order a sale subject to the liens.

No lien on any property so sold shall be paid unless it is recorded prior to the committing of the nuisance and unless the lienor can establish he had no knowledge of the nuisance.

If the petition is filed by a private citizen and a sale ordered, the citizen shall receive ten percent (10%) of the net proceeds of sale of any property under any judgment of forfeiture, after deducting costs and all valid liens.

The sheriff, after payment of liens, costs and fees, shall pay the balance of the proceeds of sale to the circuit clerk, who shall transmit the balance as in the case of other forfeitures.

History.

2554c-24.

242.340.
Action to enjoin nuisance.

Any Commonwealth’s attorney, county attorney or private citizen may maintain an action in equity in the name of the state to enjoin any nuisance described by KRS

242.310

.

No bond shall be required in instituting proceedings under this section.

History.

2554c-25.

242.350.
Court may enjoin nuisance.

If it is made to appear to the satisfaction of the court that a nuisance described by KRS

242.310

exists, a temporary injunction shall forthwith issue, restraining the defendant from conducting or permitting the continuance of the nuisance until the conclusion of the trial. If a temporary injunction is prayed for, the court may issue an order restraining all persons from interfering in any way with the alcoholic beverages, fixtures or other things used in connection with the nuisance.

It shall not be necessary for the court to find the property involved is being unlawfully used as described in KRS

242.310

at the time of the hearing, but on finding that the material allegations of the petition are true, the court shall order that no alcoholic beverages shall be sold, bartered or stored on the premises or vehicle, or any part thereof. Upon judgment of the court ordering the nuisance abated, the court may order that the premises or vehicle shall not be occupied or used for six (6) months.

The court may permit the premises or vehicle to be used if the owner, lessee, tenant or occupant gives bond with sufficient surety, to be approved by the court making the order, in the sum of not less than five hundred dollars ($500) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), payable to the state and conditioned that alcoholic beverages will not thereafter be sold, bartered, kept or otherwise disposed of on or in the premises or vehicle, and that he will pay all fines, costs and damages that may be assessed for any violation of this chapter on or in the premises or vehicle.

History.

2554c-25: amend. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 220, effective January 2, 1978.

242.360.
Illegal transportation of liquor — Seizure of property.

When a peace officer discovers any person in dry territory in the act of illegally possessing or transporting alcoholic beverages in any vehicle, he shall at once seize the vehicle and any and all alcoholic beverages found in it and arrest any person or persons in charge thereof.

Upon conviction of a person arrested under subsection (1), the court shall order the vehicle seized sold at public auction unless the owner of the vehicle proves that it was being used without his knowledge, consent or approval.

The expenses of keeping and selling the vehicle and all valid recorded liens that are established by intervention at a hearing as being bona fide shall be paid out of the proceeds of the sale. The lienor must prove that the property was being used without his knowledge, consent or approval.

After the satisfaction of expenses and liens, the court shall direct that the balance of the proceeds be paid to the circuit clerk, who shall transmit the balance as in the case of other forfeitures. The court shall order all sales to be made by the sheriff, who shall receive and be allowed the same fees as allowed for sales under execution.

History.

2554c-26.

242.370.
Search and seizure.

When an officer or any reputable citizen files an affidavit with any Circuit or District Judge, describing premises or a vehicle, where alcoholic beverages are sold, disposed of or possessed in violation of this chapter, the judge shall by his warrant cause the premises or vehicle to be searched for the detection of any alcoholic beverages which are possessed, or kept for disposition, in violation of this chapter.

Any officer receiving such a warrant shall immediately execute it on the day it is received.

If admission is not given on demand, the officers enforcing the warrant shall force an entrance into the premises or vehicle. If the officer finds that alcoholic beverages are being illegally sold, disposed of or possessed, he shall seize the alcoholic beverages, arrest the keeper or person in charge of the premises, vehicle or alcoholic beverages and carry the person arrested and the alcoholic beverages before the judge that has issued the warrant.

No search warrant as provided for in this section shall be quashed if it and the affidavit on which it is based are sufficient on the face. If the search warrant is quashed no property taken by virtue of it shall be ordered returned unless the person from whose possession the property was taken both alleges and proves that he was in lawful possession of the property.

History.

2554c-34: amend. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 221, effective January 2, 1978.

242.380.
Illegal beverages — No property rights in — Exception — Destruction.

No property rights other than those in the court of appropriate jurisdiction pursuant to KRS

244.195

shall exist in any alcoholic beverages obtained, possessed, held or used in violation of this chapter.

The court, upon conviction of the person arrested, shall order the alcoholic beverages to be destroyed by the sheriff for the county in which the alcoholic beverages were seized.

History.

2554c-27: amend. Acts 1978, ch. 194, § 8, effective June 17, 1978; 1984, ch. 132, § 1, effective July 13, 1984.

242.390.
Reputation of defendant admissible in evidence. [Repealed.]

242.400.
United States license — Possession evidence of guilt. [Repealed]

History.

2554c-39; repealed by 2017 ch. 62, § 119, effective June 29, 2017.

242.410.
Bond for good behavior upon conviction.

On a first or second conviction for violation of any of the provisions of this chapter, the court shall require the defendant, in addition to the penalty provided by subsection (1) of KRS

242.990

, to execute bond of not less than five hundred ($500) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) to be of good behavior for twelve (12) months and not violate any of the provisions of this chapter. If the bond is not executed, the defendant shall be imprisoned in the county jail for sixty (60) days.

The order of the trial court, requiring the execution of the peace bond, shall not be subject to appeal and shall not be considered as punishment.

History.

2554c-29.

242.420.
Witness may not refuse to answer.

No witness before a grand jury, court of inquiry or on a trial for any violation of this chapter shall be permitted to refuse to answer any question because the answer will incriminate him, but this evidence shall not be used against him in any subsequent action and he shall not be prosecuted for any offense disclosed in his testimony.

History.

2554c-36.

242.430.
Allegations of indictment.

The indictment charging the commission of an offense under this chapter need not allege that a vote was taken or an election held in the territory where the offense is alleged to have been committed, but it may simply allege that the act charged was committed in dry or moist territory and was a violation of this chapter.

History.

2554c-35: amend. 2013, ch. 121, § 30, effective June 25, 2013.